lt-LT: Testo formatas: Programėlės pagrindu; Skaitmeninė; Vidurinė srovė; Ekranas; Kasetinis testas; Testavimo indelis; Testavimo juostelė; Kita
fr: Format du test: Basé sur une application; Numérique; Intermédiaire; Moniteur; Cassette de test; Gobelet de test; Bandelette de test; Autre
ro-RO: Format de testare: Pe bază pe aplicație; Digital; Midstream; Monitor; Casetă de testare; Cupă de testare; Bandă de testare; Altele
pt-BR: Formato do teste: Baseado em aplicativo; Digital; Midstream; Monitor; Fita de teste; Copo de teste; Tira de teste; Outro
zh-CN: 测试形式: 基于应用; 数字化; 中游; 监视器; 测试卡; 测试杯; 试纸; 其他
pt-PT: Formato de teste: Em aplicação; Digital; Colheita; Monitor; Cassete de teste; Copo de teste; Tira de teste; Outro
ko: 테스트 형식: 앱 기반; 디지털; 미드스트림; 모니터; 테스트 카세트; 테스트 컵; 테스트지; 기타
hr-HR: Format testiranja: U aplikaciji; Digitalni; Midstream; Zaslon; Kaseta za testiranje; Čašica za testiranje; Test-trakica; Ostalo
nl: Testformaat: App-gebaseerd; Digitaal; Middenstroom; Monitor; Testcassette; Testbeker; Teststrip; Andere
cs: Forma testu: S využitím aplikace; Digitální; Z moči; Monitor; Testovací kazeta; Testovací kelímek; Testovací proužek; Jiné
bg-BG: Формат на теста: Базиран на приложение; Цифров; Midstream; Монитор; Тестова касета; Тестова чашка; Тестова лента; Други
th: รูปแบบการทดสอบ: ตามแอป; ดิจิทัล; มิดสตรีม; เฝ้าติดตาม; ตลับทดสอบ; ถ้วยทดสอบ; แถบทดสอบ; อื่นๆ
fi: Testiformaatti: Sovelluspohjainen; Digitaalinen; Keskisuihku; Seuranta; Testikasetti; Testikuppi; Testiliuska; Muu
el: Μορφή δοκιμής: Βασισμένο σε εφαρμογές; Ψηφιακός; Μέσο του ποταμού; Μόνιτορ; Δοκιμαστική κασέτα; Κύπελλο δοκιμής; Ταινία εξέτασης; Άλλο
sk-SK: Testovací formát: Na základe aplikácie; Digitálny; Stredný prúd; Monitor; Testovacia kazeta; Testovací pohár; Testovací prúžok; Iné
pl: Format testu: Oparte na aplikacji; Cyfrowe; Środkowa faza procesu; Monitor; Kaseta testowa; Pojemnik testowy; Pasek testowy; Inne
ja: 検査形式: アプリベース; デジタル; 中流; モニター; テストカセット; テストカップ; テストストリップ; その他
nb: Testformat: App-basert; Digital; Midstrøm; Monitor; Testkassett; Testkopp; Teststrimmel; Annet
da: Testformat: App-baseret; Digital; Midstream; Monitor; Testkassette; Testkop; Teststrimmel; Andet
en: Test format: App-based; Digital; Midstream; Monitor; Test cassette; Test cup; Test strip; Other
sl-SI: Testna oblika: Temelji na aplikaciji; Digitalno; Curek urina; Monitor; Testna kaseta; Testna skodelica; Testni listič; Drugo
it: Formato del test: Basato su app; Digitale; A metà; Monitor; Cassetta per test; Vasetto per test; Striscia reattiva; Altro
tr: Test Formatı: Uygulamaya dayalı; Dijital; Midstream; Monitörlü; Test kaseti; Test kabı; Test şeridi; Diğer
sv: Testformat: Appbaserad; Digital; Midstream; Skärm; Testkassett; Testkopp; Testremsa; Övrigt
hu: Tesztelés formája: Alkalmazásalapú; Digitális; Midstream; Monitor; Tesztkazetta; Tesztpohár; Tesztcsík; Egyéb
zh-TW: 檢測格式: 基於應用程式; 數位; 中游; 監測器; 測試盒; 檢測杯; 試紙; 其他
ru: Формат теста: На основе приложения; Цифровой; По ходу работы; Монитор; Тестовая кассета; Тестовая чашка; Тест-полоска; Другой
es: Formato de prueba: Basado en aplicaciones; Digital; Flujo medio; Monitor; Casete de prueba; Vaso de prueba; Tira de prueba; Otros
de: Testformat: App-basiert; Digital; Mittelstrahl; Monitor; Testkassette; Testbecher; Teststreifen; Sonstiges
vi: Định dạng xét nghiệm: Dựa trên ứng dụng; Kỹ thuật số; Giữa dòng; Màn hình; Băng thử nghiệm; Cốc thử; Que thử; Khác